Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Oil and Gas Production Tax.
Sec. 43.55.020.
Payment of tax.

For a calendar year, a producer subject to tax under AS

43.55.011

shall pay the tax as follows:

for oil and gas produced before January 1, 2014, an installment payment of the estimated tax levied by AS

43.55.011

(e), net of any tax credits applied as allowed by law, is due for each month of the calendar year on the last day of the following month; except as otherwise provided under (2) of this subsection, the amount of the installment payment is the sum of the following amounts, less 1/12 of the tax credits that are allowed by law to be applied against the tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

for the calendar year, but the amount of the installment payment may not be less than zero:

for oil and gas not subject to AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p) produced from leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, other than leases or properties subject to AS

43.55.011(f)

, the greater of

zero; or

the sum of 25 percent and the tax rate calculated for the month under AS

43.55.011(g)

multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS

43.55.165

and

43.55.170

that are deductible for the oil and gas under AS

43.55.160

from the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for oil and gas produced from leases or properties subject to AS

43.55.011(f)

, the greatest of

zero;

zero percent, one percent, two percent, three percent, or four percent, as applicable, of the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated; or

the sum of 25 percent and the tax rate calculated for the month under AS

43.55.011(g)

multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS

43.55.165

and

43.55.170

that are deductible for the oil and gas under AS

43.55.160

from the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from those leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for oil or gas subject to AS

43.55.011(j)

, (k), or (o), for each lease or property, the greater of

zero; or

the sum of 25 percent and the tax rate calculated for the month under AS 43.55.011(g) multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible under AS 43.55.160 for the oil or gas, respectively, produced from the lease or property from the gross value at the point of production of the oil or gas, respectively, produced from the lease or property during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for oil and gas subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

, the lesser of

the sum of 25 percent and the tax rate calculated for the month under AS 43.55.011(g) multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil and gas under AS 43.55.160 from the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated, but not less than zero; or

four percent of the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month, but not less than zero;

an amount calculated under (1)(C) of this subsection for oil or gas subject to AS

43.55.011(j)

, (k), or (o) may not exceed the product obtained by carrying out the calculation set out in AS

43.55.011(j)(1)

or (2) or

43.55.011(o)

, as applicable, for gas or set out in AS

43.55.011(k)

for oil, but substituting in AS

43.55.011(j)(1)

(A) or (2)(A) or 43.55.011(o), as applicable, the amount of taxable gas produced during the month for the amount of taxable gas produced during the calendar year and substituting in AS

43.55.011(k)

the amount of taxable oil produced during the month for the amount of taxable oil produced during the calendar year;

an installment payment of the estimated tax levied by AS

43.55.011(i)

for each lease or property is due for each month of the calendar year on the last day of the following month; the amount of the installment payment is the sum of

the applicable tax rate for oil provided under AS

43.55.011(i)

, multiplied by the gross value at the point of production of the oil taxable under AS 43.55.011(i) and produced from the lease or property during the month; and

the applicable tax rate for gas provided under AS 43.55.011(i), multiplied by the gross value at the point of production of the gas taxable under AS 43.55.011(i) and produced from the lease or property during the month;

any amount of tax levied by AS 43.55.011, net of any credits applied as allowed by law, that exceeds the total of the amounts due as installment payments of estimated tax is due on March 31 of the year following the calendar year of production;

for oil and gas produced on and after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2022, an installment payment of the estimated tax levied by AS

43.55.011(e)

, net of any tax credits applied as allowed by law, is due for each month of the calendar year on the last day of the following month; except as otherwise provided under (6) of this subsection, the amount of the installment payment is the sum of the following amounts, less 1/12 of the tax credits that are allowed by law to be applied against the tax levied by AS 43.55.011(e) for the calendar year, but the amount of the installment payment may not be less than zero:

for oil and gas not subject to AS 43.55.011(o) or (p) produced from leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, other than leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(f), the greater of

zero; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil and gas under AS 43.55.160 from the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for oil and gas produced from leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(f), the greatest of

zero;

zero percent, one percent, two percent, three percent, or four percent, as applicable, of the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil and gas under AS 43.55.160 from the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from those leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated, except that, for the purposes of this calculation, a reduction from the gross value at the point of production may apply for oil and gas subject to AS

43.55.160(f)

or (g);

for oil or gas subject to AS 43.55.011(j), (k), or (o), for each lease or property, the greater of

zero; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible under AS 43.55.160 for the oil or gas, respectively, produced from the lease or property from the gross value at the point of production of the oil or gas, respectively, produced from the lease or property during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for oil and gas subject to AS

43.55.011(p)

, the lesser of

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil and gas under AS 43.55.160 from the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated, but not less than zero; or

four percent of the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from the leases or properties during the month, but not less than zero;

an amount calculated under (5)(C) of this subsection for oil or gas subject to AS 43.55.011(j), (k), or (o) may not exceed the product obtained by carrying out the calculation set out in AS 43.55.011(j)(1) or (2) or 43.55.011(o), as applicable, for gas or set out in AS 43.55.011(k) for oil, but substituting in AS 43.55.011(j)(1)(A) or (2)(A) or 43.55.011(o), as applicable, the amount of taxable gas produced during the month for the amount of taxable gas produced during the calendar year and substituting in AS 43.55.011(k) the amount of taxable oil produced during the month for the amount of taxable oil produced during the calendar year;

for oil and gas produced on or after January 1, 2022, an installment payment of the estimated tax levied by AS 43.55.011(e), net of any tax credits applied as allowed by law, is due for each month of the calendar year on the last day of the following month; except as otherwise provided under (10) of this subsection, the amount of the installment payment is the sum of the following amounts, less 1/12 of the tax credits that are allowed by law to be applied against the tax levied by AS 43.55.011(e) for the calendar year, but the amount of the installment payment may not be less than zero:

for oil produced from leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(f), the greatest of

zero;

zero percent, one percent, two percent, three percent, or four percent, as applicable, of the gross value at the point of production of the oil produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil under AS

43.55.160(h)(1)

from the gross value at the point of production of the oil produced from those leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated, except that, for the purposes of this calculation, a reduction from the gross value at the point of production may apply for oil subject to AS

43.55.160(f)

or 43.55.160(f) and (g);

for oil produced before or during the last calendar year under AS

43.55.024(b)

for which the producer could take a tax credit under AS

43.55.024(a)

, from leases or properties in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(o) or (p), the greater of

zero; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil under AS

43.55.160(h)(2)

from the gross value at the point of production of the oil produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for oil and gas produced from leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(p), except as otherwise provided under (8) of this subsection, the sum of

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil under AS

43.55.160(h)(3)

from the gross value at the point of production of the oil produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated, but not less than zero; and

13 percent of the gross value at the point of production of the gas produced from the leases or properties during the month, but not less than zero;

for oil produced from leases or properties in the state, no part of which is north of 68 degrees North latitude, other than leases or properties subject to (B), (C), or (F) of this paragraph, the greater of

zero; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible for the oil under AS

43.55.160(h)(4)

from the gross value at the point of production of the oil produced from the leases or properties during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for gas produced from each lease or property in the state outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin, other than a lease or property subject to AS 43.55.011(o) or (p), 13 percent of the gross value at the point of production of the gas produced from the lease or property during the month for which the installment payment is calculated, but not less than zero;

for oil subject to AS 43.55.011(k), for each lease or property, the greater of

zero; or

35 percent multiplied by the remainder obtained by subtracting 1/12 of the producer’s adjusted lease expenditures for the calendar year of production under AS 43.55.165 and 43.55.170 that are deductible under AS 43.55.160 for the oil produced from the lease or property from the gross value at the point of production of the oil produced from the lease or property during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for gas subject to AS 43.55.011(j) or (o), for each lease or property, the greater of

zero; or

13 percent of the gross value at the point of production of the gas produced from the lease or property during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

an amount calculated under (7)(C) of this subsection may not exceed four percent of the gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas produced from leases or properties subject to AS 43.55.011(p) during the month for which the installment payment is calculated;

for purposes of the calculation under (1)(B)(ii), (5)(B)(ii), and (7)(A)(ii) of this subsection, the applicable percentage of the gross value at the point of production is determined under AS

43.55.011(f)(1)

or (2) but substituting the phrase “month for which the installment payment is calculated” in AS

43.55.011(f)(1)

and (2) for the phrase “calendar year for which the tax is due”;

an amount calculated under (7)(F) or (G) of this subsection for oil or gas subject to AS 43.55.011(j), (k), or (o) may not exceed the product obtained by carrying out the calculation set out in AS 43.55.011(j)(1) or (2) or 43.55.011(o), as applicable, for gas, or set out in AS 43.55.011(k) for oil, but substituting in AS 43.55.011(j)(1)(A) or (2)(A) or 43.55.011(o), as applicable, the amount of taxable gas produced during the month for the amount of taxable gas produced during the calendar year and substituting in AS 43.55.011(k) the amount of taxable oil produced during the month for the amount of taxable oil produced during the calendar year.

The production tax on oil and gas shall be paid to the department by or on behalf of the producer.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 101 SLA 1972.]

[Repealed, § 33, ch. 10, SLA 2013.]

Gas flared, released, or allowed to escape in excess of the amount authorized by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission is considered, for the purpose of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

, as gas produced from a lease or property. Oil or gas used in the operation of a lease or property in the state in drilling for or producing oil or gas, or for repressuring, except to the extent determined by the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission to be waste, is not considered, for the purpose of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

, as oil or gas produced from a lease or property.

If oil or gas is produced but not sold, gas is produced but is stored in a gas storage facility, or oil or gas is produced and sold under circumstances where the sale price does not represent the prevailing value for oil or gas of like kind, character, or quality in the field or area from which the product is produced, the department may require the tax to be paid upon the basis of the value of oil or gas of the same kind, quality, and character prevailing for that field or area during the calendar month of production or sale.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS

43.05.225

,

before January 1, 2014, an unpaid amount of an installment payment required under (a)(1) — (3) of this section that is not paid when due bears interest (A) at the rate provided for an underpayment under 26 U.S.C. 6621 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, compounded daily, from the date the installment payment is due until March 31 following the calendar year of production, and (B) as provided for a delinquent tax under AS

43.05.225

after that March 31; interest accrued under (A) of this paragraph that remains unpaid after that March 31 is treated as an addition to tax that bears interest under (B) of this paragraph; an unpaid amount of tax due under (a)(4) of this section that is not paid when due bears interest as provided for a delinquent tax under AS 43.05.225;

on and after January 1, 2014, an unpaid amount of an installment payment required under (a)(3), (5), (6), or (7) of this section that is not paid when due bears interest (A) at the rate provided for an underpayment under 26 U.S.C. 6621 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, compounded daily, from the date the installment payment is due until March 31 following the calendar year of production, and (B) as provided for a delinquent tax under AS 43.05.225 after that March 31; interest accrued under (A) of this paragraph that remains unpaid after that March 31 is treated as an addition to tax that bears interest under (B) of this paragraph; an unpaid amount of tax due under (a)(4) of this section that is not paid when due bears interest as provided for a delinquent tax under AS 43.05.225.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS

43.05.280

,

an overpayment of an installment payment required under (a)(1), (2), (3), (5), (6), or (7) of this section bears interest at the rate provided for an overpayment under 26 U.S.C. 6621 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, compounded daily, from the later of the date the installment payment is due or the date the overpayment is made, until the earlier of

the date it is refunded or is applied to an underpayment; or

March 31 following the calendar year of production;

except as provided under (1) of this subsection, interest with respect to an overpayment is allowed only on any net overpayment of the payments required under (a) of this section that remains after the later of March 31 following the calendar year of production or the date that the statement required under AS

43.55.030(a)

is filed;

interest is allowed under (2) of this subsection only from a date that is 90 days after the later of March 31 following the calendar year of production or the date that the statement required under AS

43.55.030(a)

is filed; interest is not allowed if the overpayment was refunded within the 90-day period;

interest under (2) and (3) of this subsection is paid at the rate and in the manner provided in AS

43.05.225

(1).

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS

43.05.225

or (g) or (h) of this section, if the amount of a tax payment, including an installment payment, due under (a)(1) — (4) of this section is affected by the retroactive application of a regulation adopted under this chapter, the department shall determine whether the retroactive application of the regulation caused an underpayment or an overpayment of the amount due and adjust the interest due on the affected payment as follows:

if an underpayment of the amount due occurred, the department shall waive interest that would otherwise accrue for the underpayment before the first day of the second month following the month in which the regulation became effective, if

the department determines that the producer’s underpayment resulted because the regulation was not in effect when the payment was due; and

the producer demonstrates that it made a good faith estimate of its tax obligation in light of the regulations then in effect when the payment was due and paid the estimated tax;

if an overpayment of the amount due occurred and the department determines that the producer’s overpayment resulted because the regulation was not in effect when the payment was due, the obligation for a refund for the overpayment does not begin to accrue interest earlier than the following, as applicable:

except as otherwise provided under (B) of this paragraph, the first day of the second month following the month in which the regulation became effective;

90 days after an amended statement under AS

43.55.030(a)

and an application to request a refund of production tax paid is filed, if the overpayment was for a period for which an amended statement under AS

43.55.030(a)

was required to be filed before the regulation became effective.

Cushion gas in a gas storage facility is not considered to be gas used in the operation of a lease or property or gas used for repressuring as described in (e) of this section. Gas withdrawn from a gas storage facility regulated under AS 42.05 is considered to be non-native gas until all non-native gas injected into the gas storage facility has been withdrawn from the gas storage facility. Non-native gas withdrawn from a gas storage facility is not considered to be gas produced for the purposes of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

. Gas withdrawn from a gas storage facility after all non-native gas previously injected into the gas storage facility has been withdrawn is gas considered to be produced from the lease or property for the purposes of AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

. In this subsection, “native gas” and “non-native gas” have the meanings given in AS

31.05.032

.

For oil and gas produced on and after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2022, in making settlement with the royalty owner for oil and gas that is taxable under AS

43.55.011

, the producer may deduct the amount of the tax paid on taxable royalty oil and gas, or may deduct taxable royalty oil or gas equivalent in value at the time the tax becomes due to the amount of the tax paid. If the total deductions of installment payments of estimated tax for a calendar year exceed the actual tax for that calendar year, the producer shall, before April 1 of the following year, refund the excess to the royalty owner. Unless otherwise agreed between the producer and the royalty owner, the amount of the tax paid under AS

43.55.011

(e) on taxable royalty oil and gas for a calendar year, other than oil and gas the ownership or right to which constitutes a landowner’s royalty interest, is considered to be the gross value at the point of production of the taxable royalty oil and gas produced during the calendar year multiplied by a figure that is a quotient, in which

the numerator is the producer’s total tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)

(2) for the calendar year of production; and

the denominator is the total gross value at the point of production of the oil and gas taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

produced by the producer from all leases and properties in the state during the calendar year.

For oil and gas produced on and after January 1, 2022, in making settlement with the royalty owner for oil and gas that is taxable under AS

43.55.011

, the producer may deduct the amount of the tax paid on taxable royalty oil and gas, or may deduct taxable royalty oil or gas equivalent in value at the time the tax becomes due to the amount of the tax paid. If the total deductions of installment payments of estimated tax for a calendar year exceed the actual tax for that calendar year, the producer shall, before April 1 of the following year, refund the excess to the royalty owner. In making settlement with the royalty owner for gas that is taxable under AS

43.55.014

, the producer may deduct the amount of the gas paid as in-kind tax on taxable royalty gas or may deduct the gross value at the point of production of the gas paid as in-kind tax on taxable royalty gas. Unless otherwise agreed between the producer and the royalty owner, the amount of the tax paid under AS

43.55.011

(e) on taxable royalty oil for a calendar year, other than oil the ownership or right to which constitutes a landowner’s royalty interest, is considered to be the gross value at the point of production of the taxable royalty oil produced during the calendar year multiplied by a figure that is a quotient, in which

the numerator is the producer’s total tax liability under AS

43.55.011(e)(3)(A)

for the calendar year of production; and

the denominator is the total gross value at the point of production of the oil taxable under AS

43.55.011(e)

produced by the producer from all leases and properties in the state during the calendar year.

In this section, “gas storage facility” has the meaning given in AS

31.05.032

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 7 ESLA 1955; am §§ 5 — 9 ch 101 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 107 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 136 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 158 SLA 1978; am §§ 48, 49 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 27 ch 168 SLA 1990; am §§ 7 — 12 ch 2 TSSLA 2006; am §§ 22 — 24 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am § 8 ch 15 SLA 2010; am §§ 14, 15 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 51 SLA 2012; am §§ 9 — 13 ch 10 SLA 2013; am §§ 51 — 55 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 16 ch 4 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.150

” was substituted for “this chapter” in (e) of this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

43.55.200

—

43.55.240

.

Subsections (j) and (k) were enacted as (i) and (j) and relettered in 2010.

Subsection (m) was enacted as (k) in 2010 and relettered in 2014.

Subsection (

l

) was enacted as (m) and relettered in 2014.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 - 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For levy of tax, see 15 AAC 55, art. 4.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (a)(2) and (6), substituted “AS

43.55.011(k)

” for “AS

43.55.011(k)

(1) or (2), as applicable,”, or similar, twice; in (a)(7) in the introductory language, inserted “except as otherwise provided under (10) of this subsection,” following “the following month;”, in (a)(7)(A), substituted “subject to AS

43.55.011(f)

” for “that include land north of 68 degrees north latitude”, in (a)(7)(B), substituted “AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p)” for “AS

43.55.011(p)

”, in (a)(7)(D), inserted “, or (F)” preceding “of this paragraph”, and made related changes, in (a)(7)(E), inserted “outside the Cook Inlet sedimentary basin” following “or property in the state” and substituted “AS

43.55.011(o)

or (p)” for “AS

43.55.011(p)

”, added (a)(7)(F) and (G), added (a)(10).

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 101, SLA 1972 (FCCS HCSSB 168), see 1972 House Journal, p. 963.
For report on ch. 107, SLA 1976 (SCS CSHB 583), see 1976 House Journal, p. 556.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 10, SLA 2013 (SB 21), see 2013 Senate Journal 33 — 36.

Sec. 43.55.021.
Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund contribution credit. [Repealed, § 25 ch 46 SLA 2002.]